src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_45RIHAE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_45RIHAE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_46HAIN !!= @CODE@ hain:hain
!! * Yaml: **N-jalg, N-hain**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_46HAIN-SG ;
        N_46HAIN_PL ;
LEXICON N_46HAIN-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-SG ;
LEXICON N_46HAIN_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN_PL ;

LEXICON N_46TARK !!= @CODE@ tark:tark
!! * Yaml: **N-jalg, N-tark**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_46TARK-SG ;
        N_46TARK_PL ;
LEXICON N_46TARK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_46TARK-SG ;
LEXICON N_46TARK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_46TARK_PL ;


LEXICON N_47ASI !!= @CODE@ asi:asi
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_47ASI-SG ;
        N_47ASI_PL ;
LEXICON N_47ASI-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-SG ;
LEXICON N_47ASI_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI_PL ;

LEXICON N_47VELI !!= @CODE@ veli:ve%{lØ%}l
:%^WGStem%>i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_47VELI-SG ;
        N_47VELI_PL ;
LEXICON N_47VELI-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_47VELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_47VELI_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_47VELI_PL ;

LEXICON N_47KIRI !!= @CODE@ kiri:kiri
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_47KIRI-SG ;
        N_47KIRI_PL ;
LEXICON N_47KIRI-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_47KIRI-SG ;
LEXICON N_47KIRI_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_47KIRI_PL ;


 

! Sublexica for the vowel stems
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

! LEXICON nom-strong
! +Sg+Nom: K ;
  
!LEXICON sgpl-cases
! +Ill:%>he K ;
! +Ine:%>n K ;
! +Ine:%>h K ;
! +Ine:%>hn K ;
! +Ela:%>st K ;
! +All:%>l%^E K ;
! +Ade:%>l K ;
! +Abl:%>lt K ;
! +Tra:%>s K ;
! +Ter:%>niq K ;
! +Abe:%>ld%^Aq K ;
! +Com:%>gaq K ;


!LEXICON com
! +Com:%>ne Pxx ;  Not to K, since Px must be present
                 ! Note that adjectives have -ine without Px

!This Needs to be moved. Here it is adjacent to the source
!LEXICON Pxx
!+PxSg1: K ;



! Lexica for the non-uniform cases
! --------------------------------

! does not handle valoaan vs. *salaaan

!LEXICON long-par
! +Sg+Par:%>t%^A K ;


!LEXICON N_2ELAENUEQ !!= * @CODE@ elänüq:elänü
!:q ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!    N_2ELAENUEQ-SG  ;
!    N_2ELAENUEQ_PL  ;

!LEXICON  N_2ELAENUEQ-SG
!: NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ-SG  ;
!LEXICON N_2ELAENUEQ_PL
!: NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELAENUEQ_PL  ;

!! ### NOMINAL DECLENSIONS

LEXICON NMN_1HANS1A !!= @CODE@ 1 hanśa:hanśa
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 01 hanśa
!!€ hanśa       hanśa+N+Sg+Nom:
!!€ hanśat      hanśa+N+Sg+Par:
!!€ hanśahtõ    hanśa+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ hanśast     hanśa+N+Sg+Ela:
!!€ hanśalõ     hanśa+N+Sg+All:
!!€ hanśal      hanśa+N+Sg+Ade:
!!€ hanśalt     hanśa+N+Sg+Abl:
!!€ hanśas      hanśa+N+Sg+Tra:
!!€ hanśaniq    hanśa+N+Sg+Ter:
!!€ hanśaldaq   hanśa+N+Sg+Abe:
!!€ hanśagaq    hanśa+N+Sg+Com:
!!€ hanśaq      hanśa+N+Pl+Nom:
!!€ hanśasit    hanśa+N+Pl+Par:
!!€ hanśadõhe   hanśa+N+Pl+Ill:
!!€ hanśadõst   hanśa+N+Pl+Ela:
!!€ hanśadõlõ   hanśa+N+Pl+All:
!!€ hanśadõl    hanśa+N+Pl+Ade:
!!€ hanśadõlt   hanśa+N+Pl+Abl:
!!€ hanśadõs    hanśa+N+Pl+Tra:
!!€ hanśadõniq  hanśa+N+Pl+Ter:
!!€ hanśadõldaq hanśa+N+Pl+Abe:
!!€ hanśadõgaq  hanśa+N+Pl+Com:

        NMN_1HANS1A-SG ;
        NMN_1HANS1A_PL ;
LEXICON NMN_1HANS1A-SG
 Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
 SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_htE ;
+Err/Dial: SG_ILL_dE ;
LEXICON NMN_1HANS1A_PL
:%>dõ PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%>dõ PL_ILL_he ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_PAR_sit ;
:%>dõ PL_COM ;

+Err/Dial:%>sii PL_PAR_d ;
+Err/Dial:%>dõ        PL_ILL_dE ;

!LEXICON NMN_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu kakao
!        NMN_1VIU-SG ;
!        NMN_1VIU_PL ;
LEXICON NMN_1VIU-SG
 Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
 SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_d ; !! in d
 Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_htE ;
+Err/Dial: SG_ILL_dE ;
LEXICON NMN_1VIU_PL
:%>dõ PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%>dõ PL_ILL_he ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_PAR_sit ;
:%>dõ PL_COM ;

+Err/Dial:%>sii PL_PAR_d ;
+Err/Dial:%>dõ        PL_ILL_dE ;

LEXICON NMN_1HERRAE !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 01 herrä
!!€ herrä       herrä+N+Sg+Nom:
!!€ herrät      herrä+N+Sg+Par:
!!€ herrähte    herrä+N+Sg+Ill:
!!€ herräst     herrä+N+Sg+Ela:
!!€ herräle     herrä+N+Sg+All:
!!€ herräl      herrä+N+Sg+Ade:
!!€ herrält     herrä+N+Sg+Abl:
!!€ herräs      herrä+N+Sg+Tra:
!!€ herräniq    herrä+N+Sg+Ter:
!!€ herräldäq   herrä+N+Sg+Abe:
!!€ herrägaq    herrä+N+Sg+Com:
!!€ herräq      herrä+N+Pl+Nom:
!!€ herräsit    herrä+N+Pl+Par:
!!€ herrädehe   herrä+N+Pl+Ill:
!!€ herrädest   herrä+N+Pl+Ela:
!!€ herrädele   herrä+N+Pl+All:
!!€ herrädel    herrä+N+Pl+Ade:
!!€ herrädelt   herrä+N+Pl+Abl:
!!€ herrädes    herrä+N+Pl+Tra:
!!€ herrädeniq  herrä+N+Pl+Ter:
!!€ herrädeldäq herrä+N+Pl+Abe:
!!€ herrädegaq  herrä+N+Pl+Com:

        NMN_1HERRAE-SG ;
        NMN_1HERRAE_PL ;
LEXICON NMN_1HERRAE-SG
 Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
 SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_htE ;
+Err/Dial: SG_ILL_dE ;
LEXICON NMN_1HERRAE_PL
:%>de PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%>de PL_ILL_he ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_PAR_sit ;
:%>de PL_COM ;

+Err/Dial:%>sii PL_PAR_d ;
+Err/Dial:%>de        PL_ILL_dE ;

!LEXICON NMN_1PREI !!= @CODE@ 1 prei:prei
!        NMN_1PREI-SG ;
!        NMN_1PREI_PL ;
LEXICON NMN_1PREI-SG
 Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
 SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_d ; !! in d
 Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_htE ;
+Err/Dial: SG_ILL_dE ;
LEXICON NMN_1PREI_PL
:%>de PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%>de PL_ILL_he ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_PAR_sit ;
:%>de PL_COM ;

+Err/Dial:%>sii PL_PAR_d ;
+Err/Dial:%>de        PL_ILL_dE ;

LEXICON NMN_2ARTIKLI
!! * Yaml: **suhvli**
   NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
   NMN_2ARTIKLI_PL ;

LEXICON NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG
 Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
 SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM       ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_he ;

+Err/Dial: SG_ILL_dE ;
LEXICON NMN_2ARTIKLI_PL
 Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
 Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
        PL_ILL_he       ;
        PL_ALL_lE-STEM       ;
      PL_PAR_t        ;
:dõ     PL_COM ;
+Err/Dial:i Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
+Err/Dial:i      PL_PAR_d        ;
+Err/Dial:i      PL_ILL_he       ;
+Err/Dial:      PL_ILL_dE       ;
+Err/Dial:i      PL_ILL_dE       ;
+Err/Dial:i      PL_ALL_lE-STEM       ;
+Err/Dial:idõ     PL_COM ;

LEXICON NMN_2KERGE
!! * Yaml: **kerge**
   NMN_2KERGE-SG ;
   NMN_2KERGE_PL ;

LEXICON NMN_2KERGE-SG
 Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
 SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM       ;
 Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
 FRONT_SG_ILL_he ;

+Err/Dial: SG_ILL_dE ;
LEXICON NMN_2KERGE_PL
 Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
:%^VowRM%>i Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%^VowRM%>i        PL_ILL_he       ;
:%^VowRM%>i        PL_ALL_lE-STEM       ;
:%^VowRM%>i      PL_PAR_t        ;
:%^VowRM%>ide     PL_COM ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>ii Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>ii      PL_PAR_d        ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>ii      PL_ILL_he       ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>i      PL_ILL_dE       ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>ii      PL_ILL_dE       ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>ii      PL_ALL_lE-STEM       ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>iide     PL_COM ;

LEXICON NMN_3PERAEDUE !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!! * Yaml: **A-peraedue3** same as aladu
   NMN_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
   NMN_3PERAEDUE_PL ;

LEXICON NMN_3PERAEDUE-SG
:%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem FRONT_SG_ILL_he ;
LEXICON NMN_3PERAEDUE_PL
:%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>i Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>i      PL_ILL_he       ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>i      PL_PAR_d        ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>i      PL_ALL_lE-STEM       ;

LEXICON NMN_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 03 aladu
!!€ aladu       aladu+A+Sg+Nom:
!!€ alatut      aladu+A+Sg+Par:
!!€ alatuhe     aladu+A+Sg+Ill:
!!€ alatuid     aladu+A+Pl+Par:
!!€ alatuihe    aladu+A+Pl+Ill:
!!€ alatuilõ    aladu+A+Pl+All:
!!€ alatumb     aladu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:

!! * Yaml: **A-aladu3**
   NMN_3ALADU-SG ;
   NMN_3ALADU_PL ;

LEXICON NMN_3ALADU-SG
:%^Pen%^WGStem Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:%^Pen%^WGStem SG_GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_t ;
:%^Pen%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_he ;
