src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
edejalg+N:edejalg N_46TARK "_#jala, #%{ˋØ%}jalga__ede|jalg_" ;
hind+N:hin%{dn%} N_46TARK "_hinna, %{ˋØ%}hinda__hind_" ;
hirremõts+N:hirremõts N_46HAIN "_#mõtsa, #%{ˋØ%}mõtsa__hirre|mõts_" ;
ihnõqkaal+N:ihnõqkaal N_46HAIN "_#kaala, #%{ˋØ%}kaala __ihnõq|kaal_" ;
juudanahk+N:%{ˋØ%}#juudanah%{kØ%} N_46TARK "_#naha, #%{ˋØ%}nahka__ˋjuuda|nahk_" ;
kaal+N:kaal N_46HAIN "_kaala, %{ˋØ%}kaala__kaal_" ;
kananahk+N:kananah%{kØ%} N_46TARK "_#naha, #%{ˋØ%}nahka__kana|nahk_" ;
karv+N:karv N_46HAIN "_karva, %{ˋØ%}karva__karv_" ;
klopilaud+N:klopila%{uv%}%{dv%} N_46TARK "_#lavva, #%{ˋØ%}lauda__klopi|laud_" ;
krantśkaal+N:krantśkaal N_46HAIN "_#kaala, #%{ˋØ%}kaala__krantś|kaal_" ;
kõtr+N:kõtr N_46TARK "_kõdra, %{ˋØ%}kõtra__kõtr_" ;
liivahaud+N:liivaha%{uv%}%{dv%} N_46TARK "_#havva, #%{ˋØ%}hauda__liiva|haud_" ;
lutikhain+N:lutikhain N_46HAIN "_#haina, #%{ˋØ%}haina __lutik|hain_" ;
magonahk+N:magonah%{kØ%} N_46TARK "_#naha, #%{ˋØ%}nahka__mago|nahk_" ;
mass+N:mass N_46HAIN "_massa, %{ˋØ%}massa__mass_" ;
nisõldushain+N:nisõldushain N_46HAIN "_#haina, #%{ˋØ%}haina__nisõldus|hain_" ;
nõnatark+N:nõ̭natar%{kg%} N_46TARK "_#targa, #%{ˋØ%}tarka__nõ̭na|tark_" ;
oŕavits+N:oŕavits N_46HAIN "_#vitsa, #%{ˋØ%}vitsa __oŕa|vits_" ;
pilupaun+N:pilupaun N_46HAIN "_#pauna, #%{ˋØ%}pauna__pilu|paun_" ;
pliiḱaid+N:pli̬i̬ḱai%{dØ%} N_46TARK "_#aia, #%{ˋØ%}aida __pli̬i̬ḱ|aid_" ;
ritkhain+N:ritkhain N_46HAIN "_#haina, #%{ˋØ%}haina__ritk|hain_" ;
saavõlinahk+N:saavõlinah%{kØ%} N_46TARK "_#naha, #%{ˋØ%}nahka__saavõli|nahk_" ;
sõmmõŕhain+N:sõmmõŕhain N_46HAIN "_#haina, #%{ˋØ%}haina__sõmmõŕ|hain_" ;
tahraid+N:tahrai%{dØ%} N_46TARK "_#aia, #%{ˋØ%}aida __tahr|aid_" ;
tuulõkaar+N:tuulõkaar N_46HAIN "_#kaara, #%{ˋØ%}kaara__tuulõ|kaar_" ;
ussaid+N:ussai%{dØ%} N_46TARK "_#aia, #%{ˋØ%}aida__uss|aid_" ;
vihv+N:vihv N_46HAIN "_vihva, %{ˋØ%}vihva__vihv_" ;
võlg+N:võlg N_46TARK "_võla, %{ˋØ%}võlga__võlg_" ;
aokiri+N:aoki%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä #kiŕa, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä #%{ˋØ%}kirja__ao|kiri_" ;
mängoasi+N:mängo#a%{sś%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_aśa, %{ˋØ%}asja__asi_" ;
iihnkiri+N:i̬i̬hnkir%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä__i̬i̬hn|kiri_" ;
imeasi+N:imea%{sś%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_#aśa, #%{ˋØ%}asja__ime|asi_" ;
juurõvili+N:juurõvi%{lĺ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#vi(l)lä #vi(l)ĺa, #%{ˋØ%}viljä #%{ˋØ%}vilja__juurõ|vili_" ;
kabi+N:kab%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_kabja kaøa, %{ˋØ%}kapja__kabi_" ;
kari+N:ka%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_kaŕa, %{ˋØ%}karja__kari_" ;
kiri+N:ki%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_kirä kiŕa, %{ˋØ%}kirjä %{ˋØ%}kirja__kiri_" ;
kunnaosi+N:kunnao%{sś%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_#ośa, #%{ˋØ%}osja__kunna|osi_" ;
käokiri+N:käoki%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä #kiŕa, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä #%{ˋØ%}kirja__käo|kiri_" ;
liivamari+N:liivama%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_#maŕa, #%{ˋØ%}marja__liiva|mari_" ;
lõvvavili+N:lõvvavi%{lĺ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#vi(l)lä #vi(l)ĺa, #%{ˋØ%}viljä #%{ˋØ%}vilja__lõvva|vili_" ;
maakari+N:maaka%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_#kaŕa, #%{ˋØ%}karja__maa|kari_" ;
manoqkiri+N:manoqki%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä #kiŕa, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä #%{ˋØ%}kirja__manoq|kiri_" ;
mari+N:ma%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_maŕa, %{ˋØ%}marja__mari_" ;
nimekiri+N:nime#ki%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä #kiŕa, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä #%{ˋØ%}kirja__pääl|kiri_" ;
nuri+N:nu%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_nuŕa, %{ˋØ%}nurja__nuri_" ;
osi+N:o%{sś%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_ośa, %{ˋØ%}osja__osi_" ;
põhi+N:põ%{hh́%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_põh́a, %{ˋØ%}põhja __põhi_" ;
päälkiri+N:päälki%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä #kiŕa, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä #%{ˋØ%}kirja__pääl|kiri_" ;
sari+N:sa%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_saŕa, %{ˋØ%}sarja__sari_" ;
terävili+N:terävi%{lĺ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#vi(l)lä #vi(l)ĺa, #%{ˋØ%}viljä #%{ˋØ%}vilja__terä|vili_" ;
tugikiri+N:tugikir%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_#kirä, #%{ˋØ%}kirjä__tugi|kiri_" ;
tulõkuri+N:tulõku%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_#kuŕa, #%{ˋØ%}kurja__tulõ|kuri_" ;
vili+N:vi%{lĺ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_vi(l)lä vi(l)ĺa, %{ˋØ%}viljä %{ˋØ%}vilja %{ˋØ%}villä %{ˋØ%}vilĺa__vili_" ;
puuvili+N:puu#vi%{lĺ%}%{jiØ%} N_47KIRI "_vi(l)lä vi(l)ĺa, %{ˋØ%}viljä %{ˋØ%}vilja %{ˋØ%}villä %{ˋØ%}vilĺa__vili_" ;
vislamari+N:vislama%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%} N_47ASI "_#maŕa, #%{ˋØ%}marja__visla|mari_" ;
